District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.48

Discharge in bankruptcy.

A discharge in bankruptcy following the rendering of any such judgment shall not relieve the judgment debtor from any of the requirements of this chapter.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 132, ch. 222, § 48
1981 Ed., § 40-448.
1973 Ed., § 40-464.